Arkansas, session 2025, HB1219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 6, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 — Body-Worn Cameras

12-6-901. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure that:
(1) Law enforcement officers and the public are provided the
protection of recorded interactions between law enforcement officers and the
public; and
(2) An accurate record of interactions between law enforcement
*CEB045*
01/24/2025 11:13:31 AM CEB045

HB1219
officers and the public is available for legal and training purposes.

12-6-902. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Law enforcement agency" means any police department,
county sheriff's office, or other public agency, force, or organization whose
primary responsibility is the enforcement of the criminal laws, traffic laws,
highway laws, or game and fish laws of this state.
(B) "Law enforcement agency" includes without limitation a
college or university police department; and
(2)(A) "Law enforcement officer" means a person that is:
(i) Employed by a law enforcement agency or other
public entity; and
(ii) Vested by law with a duty to maintain public
order and make arrests for offenses.
(B) "Law enforcement officer" includes without limitation
a court bailiff, school resource officer, wildlife enforcement officer, game
warden, officer of the State Capitol Police, county sheriff, and chief of
police.

12-6-903. Body-worn cameras required.
(a) By December 31, 2026, a law enforcement agency or other public
entity that employs a law enforcement officer shall:
(1) Provide a body-worn camera to each law enforcement officer
the law enforcement agency or other public entity employs;
(2) Train each law enforcement officer the law enforcement
agency or other public entity employs in the use of a body-worn camera; and
(3) Enact policies and procedures governing the use of a body-
worn camera.
(b) A law enforcement officer shall:
(1) Wear a body-worn camera while on duty; and
(2) Ensure the body-worn camera records all official interaction
between the law enforcement officer and the public while the law enforcement
officer is on duty.

12-6-904. Rulemaking.
01/24/2025 11:13:31 AM CEB045

HB1219
Any state agency, department, board, or commission that employs a law
enforcement officer, including without limitation constitutional agencies,
shall promulgate rules to implement this subchapter.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE.
(a) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the state
agency, department, board, or commission shall file the final rules with the
Secretary of State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before August 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by August 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) The state agency, department, board, or commission shall file the
proposed rules with the Legislative Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently
in advance of August 1, 2026, so that the Legislative Council may consider
the rules for approval before August 1, 2026.





















01/24/2025 11:13:31 AM CEB045